testing/sms-test-V-vuelgged.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: sms/bin/sms-gen.hfstol
    Morph: sms/bin/sms.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: sms/bin/isms.fst
    Morph: sms/bin/sms.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - vue´lǧǧed: # Verb 'to set off' - full paradigm
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Inf: vue´lǧǧed
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuâlǥam
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuâlǥak
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuâlgg
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vue´lǧǧep
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vue´lǧǧve´ted
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [vuâ´lǧǧe, vue´lǧǧe, vuâ´lǧǧe, vuä´lǧǧe, vuä´lǧǧa]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+4: vue´ljet
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vue´lj
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [vuõ´lǧǧem, vui´lǧǧem]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [vuõ´lǧǧiǩ, vui´lǧǧiǩ]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [vuõ´lji, vue´lji]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [vuõ´ljim, vuõ´ljin vue´ljim, vue´ljin]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [vuõ´ljid, vue´ljid]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vuõ´lǧǧe, vui´lǧǧe, vue´lǧǧe]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+4: vuõ´lǧǧeš
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vuâlggam
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Pot+Sg1: [vuõ´ljžem, vue´ljžem]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Pot+Sg2: [vuõ´ljžiǩ, vue´ljžiǩ]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Pot+Sg3: [vuõ´ljež, vue´ljež]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Pot+Pl1: [vuõ´ljžep,vue´ljžep, vuõ´ljžim, vue´ljžim]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Pot+Pl2: [vuõ´ljžid, vue´ljžid] 
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Pot+Pl3: [vuõ´ljže, vue´ljže]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Pot+4: [vuõ´ljžet, vue´ljžet]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Pot+ConNeg: vuõ´ljže
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Cond+Sg1: vuâlǥčem
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Cond+Sg2: vuâlǥčiǩ
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Cond+Sg3: vuâlǥči
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Cond+Pl1: [vuâlǥčim, vuâlǥčep]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Cond+Pl2: vuâlǥčid
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Cond+Pl3: vuâlǥče
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Cond+4: vuâlǥčeš
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Cond+ConNeg: vuâlǥče
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Imp+Sg2: vue´lj
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Imp+Sg3: vuâlǥas
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Imp+Pl1: vue´lǧǧep
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Imp+Pl2: vue´lǧǧed
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Imp+Pl3: vuâlǥǥaz
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Imp+ConNeg: vuõlggu
     vue´lǧǧed+V+ActEss: vue´lǧǧmen
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Action: vue´lǧǧem
     vue´lǧǧed+V+PrsPrc: [vuõ´lǧǧi, vue´lǧǧi]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+PrfPrc: vuâlggam
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: vuõlggum
     vue´lǧǧed+V+VAbess: [vue´ljkani, vue´ljǩeännai]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+GerTemp: vue´ljeen
     vue´lǧǧed+V+GerInstr: vue´ljee´l
     
     
     
     vue´lǧǧed+V+PrfPrc: vue´lǧǧâm
     
     
